Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.210

Right to adequate care and treatment—Records and reports.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) Any person involuntarily detained, hospitalized, or committed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall have the right to adequate care and individualized treatment. The person who has custody of the patient or is in charge of treatment shall keep records detailing all medical, expert, and professional care and treatment received by a committed person, and shall keep copies of all reports of periodic examinations of the patient that have been filed with the secretary pursuant to this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 10.77.205 and 4.24.550 regarding the release of information concerning insane offenders who are acquitted of sex offenses and subsequently committed pursuant to this chapter, and disclosures of health care information as authorized under chapter 70.02 RCW, all records and reports made pursuant to this chapter, shall be made available only upon request, to the committed person, to his or her attorney, to his or her personal physician, to the supervising community corrections officer, to the prosecuting attorney, to the court, to the protection and advocacy agency, or other expert or professional persons who, upon proper showing, demonstrates a need for access to such records. All records and reports made pursuant to this chapter shall also be made available, upon request, to the department of corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board if the person was on parole, probation, or community supervision at the time of detention, hospitalization, or commitment or the person is subsequently convicted for the crime for which he or she was detained, hospitalized, or committed pursuant to this chapter.

(2) All relevant records and reports as defined by the department in rule shall be made available, upon request, to criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030.

[ 2020 c 81 s 1; 1998 c 297 s 45; 1993 c 31 s 12; 1990 c 3 s 108; 1989 c 420 s 12; 1983 c 196 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.